Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
MINING AND DRILLING

Cross references.

- Powers of department and Board of Natural Resources regarding underground storage of gas,

§

46-4-60

.

Powers of State Properties Commission regarding contracts and leases for exploration, drilling, and mining, of mineral resources,

§

50-16-43

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Oil and gas and deep drilling, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-13.